Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB26.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act:
(1) "Binding contract" includes any grant, endowment, settlement agreement,
commercial contract, or other legally enforceable agreement entered into by or on
behalf of the department or a school district, public school, or cooperative board;
(2) "Cooperative board" means an interlocal cooperative board created by an
interlocal cooperative agreement entered into by one (1) or more school districts
in accordance with KRS 65.210 to 65.300 and 160.290, including but not limited
to special education cooperatives and regional education cooperatives;
(3) "Department" means the Kentucky Department of Education;
(4) "Differential treatment or benefits" means differential, preferential, or
prejudicial treatment or consideration and includes the conferring or withholding
of a benefit;
(5) "Discriminatory concept" means a concept that justifies or promotes differential
treatment or benefits conferred to individuals on the basis of religion, race, sex,
color, or national origin, unless the differential treatment or benefit is excluded
from a diversity, equity, and inclusion initiative under subsection (6) of this
section;
(6) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion initiative":
(a) Means a policy, practice, or procedure designed or implemented to promote
or provide differential treatment or benefits to individuals on the basis of
religion, race, sex, color, or national origin, including but not limited to any
such policy, practice, or procedure related to employment, employee
Page 1 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
recruitment, employee hiring, employee promotion, contracts, contract
renewal, student enrollment, and student services; and
(b) Does not include a policy, practice, procedure, office, employee, training,
program, or activity that is expressly required pursuant to an applicable
state law or federal mandate;
(7) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion office" means an office, division, or other unit
of the department or a school district, public school, or cooperative board that
that is:
(a) Responsible for developing, implementing, or promoting a discriminatory
concept, a diversity, equity, and inclusion training, or a diversity, equity,
and inclusion initiative, regardless of whether the office is designated as a
diversity, equity, and inclusion office; and
(b) Not expressly required pursuant to an applicable state law or federal
mandate;
(8) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion officer" means an employee, contractor, or
volunteer:
(a) Whose responsibilities include developing, implementing, or promoting a
discriminatory concept, a diversity, equity, and inclusion training, or a
diversity, equity, and inclusion initiative, regardless of whether the position
is designated as a diversity, equity, and inclusion position or affiliated with
a diversity, equity, and inclusion office; and
(b) Who serves in a role that is not expressly required pursuant to an applicable
state law or federal mandate;
(9) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion training" means a training, conference,
presentation, meeting, or professional development that:
(a) Contains, implements, or promotes a discriminatory concept; and
(b) Is not expressly required pursuant to applicable federal or state law, a court
Page 2 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
order, or a binding contract entered into prior to the effective date of this
Act;
(10) "Federal mandate" means a policy, program, training, activity, or procedure that
is:
(a) Designed or implemented to promote or justify discriminatory concepts or
promote or provide differential treatment or benefits to individuals on the
basis of religion, race, sex, color, or national origin; and
(b) Required pursuant to a court order, a binding contract entered into prior to
the effective date of this Act, or any applicable federal law, including but
not limited to:
1. The Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95;
2. Title IX of the Education Amendments Act of 1972, 20 U.S.C. sec.
1681 et seq., as amended;
3. The Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et
seq., as amended;
4. The Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. sec. 1400 et
seq., as amended;
5. The Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, 29 U.S.C. sec.
621 et seq., as amended; and
6. The federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, Pub. L. No. 88-352, as amended;
(11) "Public school" means a public school or public charter school of the
Commonwealth and includes all programs, departments, and offices of a public
school and any individual acting in an official capacity on behalf of a public
school;
(12) Qualified individual" means any of the following:
(a) A student enrolled in a public school;
(b) A parent or guardian of a student under the age of eighteen (18) who is
Page 3 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
enrolled in a public school;
(c) An individual who is employed by the department or a school district, public
school, or cooperative board;
(d) A candidate or applicant for employment with the department or a school
district, public school, or cooperative board; and
(e) Any entity denied a contract, transaction, or other financial opportunity
with the department or a school district, public school, or cooperative board
based upon the religion, race, sex, color, or national origin of the
ownership, management, or staff of the entity;
(13) "Resource" means:
(a) Moneys appropriated by the General Assembly;
(b) Moneys or items of value derived from bequests, charges, deposits,
donations, endowments, fees, grants, gifts, income, receipts, tuition, or any
other source;
(c) Materials and other physical resources;
(d) Digital resources, including an official website, digital application, or social
media page of an institution; or
(e) Certified and classified employees, volunteers, and other human resources;
and
(14) "School district" means a public school district of the Commonwealth, and
includes all programs, departments, cooperative boards, and offices of a school
district and any individual acting in an official capacity on behalf of a school
district.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The department or a school district, public school, or cooperative board shall not
do any of the following:
Page 4 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
(a) Provide any differential treatment or benefits to an individual, including an
applicant for employment, promotion, or contract renewal, on the basis of
the individual's religion, race, sex, color, or national origin;
(b) Prioritize or provide preferential consideration for vendors, contracts, or
other transactions based upon the religion, race, sex, color, or national
origin of the ownership, management, or staff of any business or nonprofit
entity, except that the institution may provide preferential consideration for
businesses owned by residents of Kentucky and the United States;
(c) Expend or utilize any resources to:
1. Establish or maintain a diversity, equity, and inclusion office;
2. Contract for or employ an individual to serve as a diversity, equity,
and inclusion officer;
3. Provide diversity, equity, and inclusion training or contribute to any
cost associated with planning, promoting, hosting, traveling to,
attending, presenting, or otherwise participating in diversity, equity,
and inclusion training;
4. Establish or maintain diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives;
5. Promote or justify discriminatory concepts; or
6. Purchase, promote, or distribute any content or materials that promote
or justify discriminatory concepts or diversity, equity, and inclusion
initiatives;
(d) On an application for employment, promotion, contract renewal, or other
employment benefit, solicit any pledge or statement on the applicant's
experience with or views on religion, race, sex, color, or national origin;
(e) Require or incentivize an individual to attend diversity, equity, and
inclusion training or provide any differential treatment or benefits to an
individual based on the individual's participation in diversity, equity, and
Page 5 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
inclusion training;
(f) Disseminate or profit from any research, work product, or material that
promotes or justifies discriminatory concepts or diversity, equity, and
inclusion initiatives; or
(g) Implement student disciplinary policies that consider religion, race, sex,
color, or national origin or otherwise establish student disciplinary caps or
quotas on the basis of religion, race, sex, color, or national origin.
(2) Compliance with a federal mandate shall be narrowly tailored to the express,
enforceable provisions thereof.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, nothing in this section shall be
construed to apply to or affect any of the following:
(a) Instruction on the historical oppression of a particular group of people;
(b) Academic research or creative works of students;
(c) Religious freedom of students and school employees;
(d) The conduct, speech, and freedom of association of students and student-led
organizations;
(e) Mental or physical health services provided by licensed or certified
professionals;
(f) The ability of a school district to establish or maintain a single-sex school;
(g) Bona fide occupational qualifications and accommodations based on sex
that are reasonably necessary to the normal operation of a school district or
public school and do not constitute diversity, equity, and inclusion
initiatives; or
(h) The ability of a school district or public school to comply with a federal
mandate, provided that the compliance is narrowly tailored to the express,
enforceable provisions of that federal mandate.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
Page 6 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Attorney General may bring a civil action for a writ of mandamus to compel
the department or a school district, public charter school, or cooperative board to
comply with Section 2 of this Act and subsection (3) of this section.
(2) (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a qualified individual
may bring a civil action for injunctive relief from a violation of Section 2 of
this Act or subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Sovereign, governmental, and qualified immunity are waived for the limited
purpose of bringing a claim filed under this subsection and arising from a
violation of Section 2 of this Act or subsection (3) of this section.
(c) A qualified individual may recover reasonable and actual attorney's fees
and litigation costs upon proving, by clear and convincing evidence, that a
defendant intentionally and willfully violated Section 2 of this Act or
subsection (3) of this section.
(d) The remedies identified in this subsection shall be in addition to and not in
lieu of any other remedies available at law or equity.
(3) An employee or agent of the department or a school district, public charter
school, or cooperative board shall not use, or threaten the use of, any official
authority or influence to discourage, interfere with, or otherwise retaliate against
any individual who in good faith files, supports, aids, or otherwise participates in
a civil action filed in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.
Section 4. KRS 158.4416 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Direct services" means in-person or virtual services provided directly to a
student by a school counselor, including but not limited to individual
counseling, group counseling, and individual student planning, scheduling,
and registration;
Page 7 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
(b) "Indirect services" means services provided on behalf of a student as a result
of interactions with others, including but not limited to consultation and
collaboration with parents, teachers, and other educators;
(c) "School counselor" means an individual who holds a valid school counselor
certificate issued in accordance with the administrative regulations of the
Education Professional Standards Board;
(d) "School psychologist" means an individual who holds a valid school
psychology certificate issued in accordance with the administrative
regulations of the Education Professional Standards Board;
(e) "School social worker" means an individual who holds a valid school social
work certificate issued in accordance with the administrative regulations of
the Education Professional Standards Board;
(f) "School-based mental health services provider" means a certified school
counselor, school psychologist, school social worker, or other qualified
mental health professional as defined in KRS 202A.011;
(g) "Trauma" means physical, emotional, or life-threatening harm; and
(h) "Trauma-informed approach" means incorporating principles of trauma
awareness and trauma-informed practices in a school in order to foster a safe,
stable, and understanding learning environment for all students and staff and
ensuring that all students are known well by at least one (1) adult in the school
setting.
(2) The General Assembly recognizes that all schools must provide a place for students
to feel safe and supported to learn throughout the school day, and that any trauma a
student may have experienced can have a significant impact on the ability of a
student to learn. The General Assembly directs all public schools to adopt a trauma-
informed approach to education in order to better recognize, understand, and
address the learning needs of students impacted by trauma and to foster a learning
Page 8 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
environment where all students, including those who have been traumatized, can be
safe, successful, and known well by at least one (1) adult in the school setting. The
requirements of this subsection shall apply to public charter schools as a health and
safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).
(3) (a) As funds and qualified personnel become available:
1. Each school district and each public charter school shall employ at least
one (1) school counselor in each school with the goal of the school
counselor spending at least sixty percent (60%) or more of his or her
time providing direct services to students and no more than forty percent
(40%) of his or her time providing indirect services to students; and
2. It shall be the goal that each school district and each public charter
school shall provide at least one (1) school counselor or school-based
mental health services provider who is employed by the school district
for every two hundred fifty (250) students, including but not limited to
the school counselor required in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.
(b) A school counselor or school-based mental health services provider at each
school shall be the facilitator of a trauma-informed team to identify and assist
students whose learning, behavior, and relationships have been impacted by
trauma. The trauma-informed team may consist of school administrators,
school counselors, school psychologists, school social workers, school-based
mental health services providers, community-based mental health services
providers hired by the district, family resource and youth services
coordinators, school nurses, school resource officers, and any other school or
district personnel.
(c) The trauma-informed team shall:
1. Provide assistance to school personnel to enable them to support
students whose learning, behavior, and relationships have been impacted
Page 9 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
by trauma;
2. Identify ways to recognize and respond to mental health issues in all
students; and
3. Identify ways to build resiliency and wellness in all students.
(d) Each school counselor or school-based mental health services provider
providing services pursuant to this section, and the trauma-informed team
members described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, shall provide training,
guidance, and assistance to other administrators, teachers, and staff on:
1. Recognizing symptoms of trauma in students;
2. Utilizing interventions and strategies to support the learning needs of
those students; and
3. Implementing the plan for a trauma-informed approach as described in
subsection (5) of this section.
(e) 1. School districts may employ or contract for the services of school-based
mental health services providers to assist with the development and
implementation of a trauma-informed approach and the development of
a trauma-informed team pursuant to this subsection and to enhance or
expand student mental health support services as funds and qualified
personnel become available.
2. School-based mental health services providers may provide services
through a collaboration between two (2) or more school districts or
between school districts and educational cooperatives or any other
public or private entities, including but not limited to local or regional
mental health day treatment programs.
(f) No later than November 1 of each year, the local school district
superintendent shall report to the department the number of school-based
mental health service providers, the position held, placement in the district,
Page 10 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
certification or licensure held, the source of funding for each position, a
summary of the job duties and work undertaken by each school-based mental
health service provider, and the approximate percent of time devoted to each
duty over the course of the year.
(g) The department shall annually compile and maintain a list of school-based
mental health service providers by district which shall include the information
required in paragraph (f) of this subsection.
(h) No later than June 1 of each year, the department shall provide the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the appropriate interim joint
committee [Interim Joint Committee on Education with] the information
reported by local school district superintendents and compiled in accordance
with paragraph (g) of this subsection.
(4) The department shall make available a toolkit that includes guidance, strategies,
behavioral interventions, practices, and techniques to assist school districts and
public charter schools in developing a trauma-informed approach in schools.
(5) Each local board of education and board of a public charter school shall develop a
plan for implementing a trauma-informed approach in its schools. The plan shall
include but not be limited to strategies for:
(a) Enhancing trauma awareness throughout the school community;
(b) Conducting an assessment of the school climate, including but not limited to
inclusiveness and respect for diversity;
(c) Developing trauma-informed discipline policies;
(d) Collaborating with the Department of Kentucky State Police, the local sheriff,
and the local chief of police to create procedures for notification of trauma-
exposed students; and
(e) Providing services and programs designed to reduce the negative impact of
trauma, support critical learning, and foster a positive and safe school
Page 11 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
environment for every student.
(6) (a) The trauma-informed approach plan developed in accordance with subsection
(5) of this section shall be reviewed and updated annually and submitted to
the department. The department shall annually provide a summary of the
trauma-informed approach strategies being used in districts to the board and
the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Education.
(b) This section shall not be construed to permit a trauma-informed plan or
trauma-informed approach that:
1. Incorporates a diversity, equity, and inclusion initiative as defined in
Section 1 of this Act;
2. Promotes discriminatory concepts as defined in Section 1 of this Act;
or
3. Is not aligned with Section 2 of this Act.
Section 5. KRS 158.4414 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Local boards of education, school district superintendents, administrators of state-
controlled facilities, and local and state law enforcement agencies shall cooperate to
assign one (1) or more certified school resource officers to serve each campus
where one (1) or more school buildings are used to deliver instruction to students on
a continuous basis.
(2) Local boards of education shall ensure, for each campus in the district, that at least
one (1) certified school resource officer is assigned to and working on-site full-time
in the school building or buildings on the campus. If sufficient funds and qualified
personnel are not available for this purpose for every campus, the local board of
education shall fulfill the requirements of this subsection on a per campus basis, as
approved in writing by the state school security marshal, until a certified school
resource officer is assigned to and working on-site full-time on each campus in the
Page 12 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
district.
(3) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a local board of education that is unable
to meet the requirement of subsection (2) of this section may, after consultation
with and approval by the state school security marshal, employ one (1) or more
guardians pursuant to KRS 158.4431 to provide safety and security measures for
schools within the district. The use of guardians under this subsection shall not be
used to replace the certified school resource officer required under subsection (2) of
this section, but only to provide safety and security resources until a certified school
resource officer is available.
(4) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a local board of education that has met
the requirement of subsection (2) of this section may employ one (1) or more
guardians pursuant to KRS 158.4431 to provide additional school safety and
security measures within the district.
(5) Local boards of education utilizing a school resource officer employed by a law
enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky State Police shall enter into a
memorandum of understanding with the law enforcement agency or the Department
of Kentucky State Police that specifically states the purpose of the school resource
officer program and clearly defines the roles and expectations of each party
involved in the program. The memorandum shall provide that the school resource
officer shall not be responsible for school discipline matters that are the
responsibility of school administrators or school employees.
(6) Local boards of education utilizing a school resource officer employed directly by
the local board of education shall adopt policies and procedures that specifically
state the purpose of the school resource officer program and clearly define the roles
and expectations of school resource officers and other school employees.
(7) In accordance with KRS 61.926, 527.020, and 527.070, as applicable, each school
resource officer shall be armed with a firearm, notwithstanding any provision of
Page 13 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
local board policy, local school council policy, or memorandum of agreement.
(8) The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, in collaboration with the Center for
School Safety, shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish, update, and maintain three (3) levels of training for
certification of school resource officers as follows: School Resource Officer
Training I (SRO I), School Resource Officer Training II (SRO II), and School
Resource Officer Training III (SRO III). Each level shall consist of forty (40) hours
of training, with SRO I to be completed within one (1) year of the date of the
officer's employment and SRO II and SRO III within the subsequent two (2) years.
(9) Course curriculum for school resource officers shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Foundations of school-based law enforcement;
(b) Threat assessment and response;
(c) Youth drug use and abuse;
(d) Social media and cyber security;
(e) School resource officers as teachers and mentors;
(f) Youth mental health awareness;
(g)[ Diversity and bias awareness training;
(h)] Trauma-informed action;
(h)[(i)] Understanding students with special needs; and
(i)[(j)] De-escalation strategies.
(10) All school resource officers with active school resource officer certification status
shall successfully complete forty (40) hours of annual in-service training that has
been certified or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council for school
resource officers.
(11) In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of an officer that
prevent the officer from completing the in-service training within one (1) year, the
commissioner of the Department of Criminal Justice Training or a designee may
Page 14 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
grant the officer an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days,
in which to complete the training.
(12) Any school resource officer who fails to successfully complete training
requirements within the specified time periods, including any approved time
extensions, shall lose his or her school resource officer certification and shall no
longer serve in the capacity of a school resource officer in a school.
(13) When a school resource officer is deficient in required training, the commissioner
of the Department of Criminal Justice Training or his or her designee shall notify
the council, which shall notify the officer and the officer's employing agency.
(14) A school resource officer who has lost school resource officer certification due
solely to the officer's failure to meet the training requirements of this section may
regain certification status as a school resource officer and may resume service in the
capacity of a school resource officer in a school setting upon successful completion
of the training deficiency.
(15) No later than November 1 of each year, the local school district superintendent shall
report to the Center for School Safety the number and placement of school resource
officers in the district. The report shall include the source of funding and method of
employment for each position.
(16) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be interpreted or construed to require a local
government or any of its agencies or offices to fund the school resource officer
positions required of local boards of education under this section. For purposes of
this subsection, "local government" has the same meaning as in KRS 65.8840.
(17) [Nothing in ]This section shall not prevent a private or parochial school from
entering into a memorandum of understanding with a local law enforcement agency
or the Department of Kentucky State Police to provide school resource officers
employed by the local law enforcement agency or the Department of Kentucky
State Police.
Page 15 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Each school district and cooperative board shall provide to the State Treasurer the
name, job title, duty station, salary or wages, and amount of any contracted severance
or other form of post-employment compensation, of each employee of the school
district or cooperative board by the twentieth day of each month, to be reported to the
public in the manner and method designated by the State Treasurer. As used in this
section, "cooperative board" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act.
Section 7. KRS 161.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the age of the pupil, the certification of all teachers and other
school personnel, in public schools only, is vested in the Education Professional
Standards Board. When so certified, teachers and other school personnel shall not
be required to have licensure, certification, or other forms of approval from any
other state agency for the performance of their respective assignments within the
system of public schools, except as provided for by law. All certificates authorized
under KRS 161.010 to 161.126 shall be issued in accordance with the
administrative regulations of the Education Professional Standards Board.[ After
July 15, 1994, all certificate applications and other data collection instruments of
the board shall include a request for voluntary information about the applicant's
ethnic background. This information shall be available to help local school districts
locate minority candidates. A person who holds a certificate prior to this
requirement may request that ethnic information be added to his or her file. Nothing
in] This section shall not preclude the right of an individual in a nonpublic school
from seeking voluntary certification by the Education Professional Standards
Board.
(2) Certificates shall be issued upon written application and in accordance with statutes
and regulations in effect at the time of application to persons who have completed,
Page 16 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
at colleges, universities, or local school district programs approved by the
Education Professional Standards Board for the preparation of teachers and other
school personnel, the curricula prescribed by the administrative regulations of the
Education Professional Standards Board.
(3) (a) Certification of all new teachers and teachers seeking additional certification
shall require the successful completion of appropriate assessments prior to
certification. The assessments shall be selected by the Education Professional
Standards Board and shall measure knowledge in the specific teaching field of
the applicant, including content of the field and teaching of that content. The
Education Professional Standards Board shall determine the minimum
acceptable level of achievement on each assessment. The assessments shall
measure those concepts, ideas, and facts which are being taught in teacher
education programs in Kentucky. Upon successful completion of the
assessments and the approved teacher preparation program, a professional
certificate valid for five (5) years shall be issued.
(b) If an applicant for teacher certification has completed the approved teacher
preparation program and has taken but failed to successfully complete the
appropriate assessments selected by the Education Professional Standards
Board, a conditional certificate may be issued for a period not to exceed one
(1) year. The employing school district, in collaboration with the teacher
education institution, shall provide technical assistance and mentoring support
to the conditionally certified teacher. The teacher shall retake the assessments
during the validity period of the conditional certificate. The conditional
certificate shall not be reissued. Upon successful completion of the required
assessments, a professional certificate valid for five (5) years shall be issued.
The Education Professional Standards Board shall promulgate administrative
regulations to establish the standards and procedures for issuance of a
Page 17 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
conditional certificate.
(c) If an out-of-state teacher with less than two (2) years' experience comes to
Kentucky after the deadline for taking the assessments, a temporary certificate
may be issued for a period up to six (6) months. The teacher shall take the
assessments during the period of the temporary certificate. If the teacher fails
the assessments, the temporary certificate shall be valid only for the current
semester. If the teacher passes the assessments, a professional certificate valid
for five (5) years shall be issued.
(4) A reasonable fee to be paid by the teacher and directly related to the actual cost of
the administration of the assessments shall be established by the Education
Professional Standards Board. Provisions shall be made for persons having less than
minimum levels of performance on any assessment to repeat that assessment, and
candidates shall be informed of their strengths and weaknesses in the specific
performance areas. The Education Professional Standards Board shall provide for
confidentiality of the individual assessment scores. Scores shall be available only to
the candidate and to the education officials who are responsible for determining
whether established certification standards have been met. Scores shall be used only
in the assessment for certification of new teachers and of out-of-state teachers with
less than two (2) years of teaching experience who are seeking initial certification
in Kentucky.
(5) Individuals who are participating in an alternative certification pathway, seeking
to transfer teaching certification from another state, or seeking initial
certification after completion of an out-of-state teacher preparation program,
shall successfully complete professional development training on Kentucky
education law approved by the Education Professional Standards Board. At a
minimum, the professional development training shall be two (2) hours long and
include a comprehensive overview of Section 2 of this Act and KRS 158.1415,
Page 18 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
158.181 to 158.187, 158.188, 158.189, 158.190, 158.191, 158.192, 158.193, and
158.196.
(6) If an applicant establishes eligibility for a five (5) year professional certificate under
the provisions of subsection (3)(a) of this section, the applicant shall also be eligible
for the issuance of a certificate for substitute teaching as provided by the
administrative regulations of the Education Professional Standards Board.
(7)[(6)] (a) The Education Professional Standards Board shall issue a ten (10) year
emeritus certificate to an applicant who has:
1. Retired or will retire not more than one (1) year prior to the expiration
date of the certificate;
2. Met the requirements to receive an emeritus certificate as set forth in
administrative regulation promulgated by the Education Professional
Standards Board; and
3. Completed the required application unless the provisions of KRS
161.120 apply.
(b) The Education Professional Standards Board shall issue a one (1) time five (5)
year exception certificate to an individual:
1. Whose certificate has expired;
2. Whose rank upon expiration was Rank I or Rank II;
3. Who has met the requirements to receive an exception certificate as set
forth in administrative regulation promulgated by the Education
Professional Standards Board;
4. Who completed three (3) years of classroom instruction prior to the
certificate's expiration; and
5. Who has completed the required application unless the provisions of
KRS 161.120 apply.
(8)[(7)] The Education Professional Standards Board shall approve the curricula of
Page 19 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
any college or university, or of any department thereof, for the training of teachers,
and any nontraditional or alternative teacher preparation program offered in a
public or private postsecondary education institution, private contractor, or state
agency, and shall also approve the curricula of any local district alternative
certification program, when the curricula comply with the administrative
regulations of the Education Professional Standards Board for the issuance of
certificates and when the institution has met the terms and conditions provided in
KRS 161.010 to 161.120. Any student who has completed any of these curricula, as
approved by the Education Professional Standards Board, and who has completed
the prescribed requirements for the issuance of certificates shall be granted a
certificate corresponding to the curricula completed.
(9)[(8)] The issuance of any certificate, except emergency certificates issued pursuant
to KRS 161.100, by the Education Professional Standards Board shall not be
dependent upon an offer of employment. The certification process, except for
emergency certificates, is independent of any job prospects and certification shall
be awarded on the basis of completing a teacher preparation program or an
alternative certification pathway and passing required assessments.
Section 8. KRS 160.380 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Administrative finding of child abuse or neglect" means a substantiated
finding of child abuse or neglect issued by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services that is:
1. Not appealed through an administrative hearing conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
2. Upheld at an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B and not appealed to a Circuit Court; or
3. Upheld by a Circuit Court in an appeal of the results of an
Page 20 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
(b) "Alternative education program" means a program that exists to meet the
needs of students that cannot be addressed in a traditional classroom setting
but through the assignment of students to alternative classrooms, centers, or
campuses that are designed to remediate academic performance, improve
behavior, or provide an enhanced learning experience. Alternative education
programs do not include career or technical centers or departments;
(c) "Clear CA/N check" means a letter from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services indicating that there are no administrative findings of child abuse or
neglect relating to a specific individual;
(d) "Relative" means father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son and
daughter; and
(e) "Vacancy" means any certified position opening created by the resignation,
dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or death of a certified staff
member of a local school district, or a new position created in a local school
district for which certification is required. However, if an employer-employee
bargained contract contains procedures for filling certified position openings
created by the resignation, dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or
death of a certified staff member, or creation of a new position for which
certification is required, a vacancy shall not exist, unless certified positions
remain open after compliance with those procedures.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 160.346, the school district personnel actions identified
in this section shall be carried out as follows:
(a) All appointments, promotions, and transfers of principals, supervisors,
teachers, and other public school employees shall be made only by the
superintendent of schools, who shall notify the board of the action taken. All
employees of the local district shall have the qualifications prescribed by law
Page 21 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
and by the administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education and
of the employing board. Supervisors, principals, teachers, and other
employees may be appointed by the superintendent for any school year at any
time after February 1 preceding the beginning of the school year. No
superintendent of schools shall appoint or transfer himself or herself to
another position within the school district;
(b) When a vacancy occurs in a local school district, the superintendent shall
submit the job posting to the statewide job posting system described in KRS
160.152 fifteen (15) days before the position shall be filled. The local school
district shall post position openings in the local board office for public
viewing; and
(c) When a vacancy needs to be filled in less than fifteen (15) days' time to
prevent disruption of necessary instructional or support services of the school
district, the superintendent may seek a waiver from the chief state school
officer outside of the process established in KRS 156.161. If the waiver is
approved, the appointment shall not be made until the person recommended
for the position has been approved by the chief state school officer. The chief
state school officer shall respond to a district's request for waiver or for
approval of an appointment within two (2) working days[; and
(d) When a vacancy occurs in a local district, the superintendent shall conduct a
search to locate minority teachers to be considered for the position. The
superintendent shall, pursuant to administrative regulations of the Kentucky
Board of Education, report annually the district's recruitment process and the
activities used to increase the percentage of minority teachers in the district].
(3) Restrictions on employment of relatives shall be as follows:
(a) No relative of a superintendent of schools shall be an employee of the school
district. However, this shall not apply to a relative who is a classified or
Page 22 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
certified employee of the school district for at least thirty-six (36) months
prior to the superintendent assuming office and who is qualified for the
position the employee holds. A superintendent's spouse who has previously
been employed in a school system may be an employee of the school district.
A superintendent's spouse who is employed under this provision shall not hold
a position in which the spouse supervises certified or classified employees. A
superintendent's spouse may supervise teacher aides and student teachers.
However, the superintendent shall not promote a relative who continues
employment under an exception of this subsection;
(b) No superintendent shall employ a relative of a school board member of the
district;
(c) No principal's relative shall be employed in the principal's school; and
(d) A relative that is ineligible for employment under paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection may be employed as a substitute for a certified or classified
employee if the relative is not:
1. A regular full-time or part-time employee of the district;
2. Accruing continuing contract status or any other right to continuous
employment;
3. Receiving fringe benefits other than those provided other substitutes; or
4. Receiving preference in employment or assignment over other
substitutes.
(4) No superintendent shall assign a certified or classified staff person to an alternative
education program as part of any disciplinary action taken pursuant to KRS 161.011
or 161.790 as part of a corrective action plan established pursuant to the local
district evaluation plan.
(5) No superintendent shall employ in any position in the district any person who:
(a) Has been convicted of an offense that would classify a person as a violent
Page 23 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
offender under KRS 439.3401;
(b) Has been convicted of a sex crime as defined by KRS 17.500 or a
misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510;
(c) Is required to register as a sex offender under KRS 17.500 to 17.580; or
(d) Has an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect in records maintained
by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(6) Requirements for background checks shall be as follows:
(a) A superintendent shall require the following individuals to submit to a
national and state criminal background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual:
1. Each new certified or classified hire;
2. A nonfaculty coach or nonfaculty assistant as defined under KRS
161.185;
3. A student teacher;
4. A school-based decision making council parent member; and
5. Any adult who is permitted access to school grounds on a regularly
scheduled and continuing basis pursuant to a written agreement for the
purpose of providing services directly to a student or students as part of
a school-sponsored program or activity;
(b) 1. The requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to:
a. Classified and certified individuals employed by the school district
prior to June 27, 2019;
b. Certified individuals who were employed in another certified
position in a Kentucky school district within six (6) months of the
date of hire and who had previously submitted to a national and
state criminal background check and who have a clear CA/N check
Page 24 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
for the previous employment; or
c. Student teachers who have submitted to and provide a copy of a
national and state criminal background check by the Department
of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
through an accredited teacher education institution in which the
student teacher is enrolled and who have a clear CA/N check.
2. The Education Professional Standards Board may promulgate
administrative regulations to impose additional qualifications to meet
the requirements of Pub. L. No. 92-544;
(c) A parent member may serve prior to the receipt of the criminal history
background check and CA/N letter required by paragraph (a) of this
subsection but shall be removed from the council on receipt by the school
district of a report documenting a record of abuse or neglect, or a sex crime or
criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as defined in KRS 17.500, or
as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, and no further procedures
shall be required;
(d) A superintendent may require a volunteer or a visitor to submit to a national
and state criminal history background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual; and
(e) The superintendent of a school district operating under an alternative
transportation plan approved by the Kentucky Department of Education in
accordance with KRS 156.153(3) shall require the driver of any non-school
bus passenger vehicle authorized to transport students to and from school
pursuant to the alternative transportation plan who does not have a valid
commercial driver's license issued in accordance with KRS Chapter 281A
with an "S" endorsement to:
Page 25 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
1. Submit to a national and state criminal background check by the
Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation at least once every three (3) years and a criminal records
check conducted in accordance with KRS 27A.090 in all other years;
2. Submit to drug testing consistent with the requirements of 49 C.F.R. pt.
40;
3. Provide a biannual driving history record check performed by the
Transportation Cabinet;
4. Provide an annual clear CA/N check;
5. Immediately notify the superintendent of any conviction for a violation
under KRS Chapter 189 for which penalty points are assessed; and
6. Immediately notify the superintendent of any citation or arrest for a
violation of any provision of KRS Chapter 189A. The superintendent
shall inform the Kentucky Department of Education of the notification.
(7) (a) If a certified or classified position remains unfilled after July 31 or if a
vacancy occurs during a school term, a superintendent may employ an
individual, who will have supervisory or disciplinary authority over minors,
on probationary status pending receipt of the criminal history background
check and a clear CA/N check, provided by the individual. Application for the
criminal record and a request for a clear CA/N check of a probationary
employee shall be made no later than the date probationary employment
begins.
(b) Employment shall be contingent on the receipt of the criminal history
background check documenting that the probationary employee has no record
of a sex crime nor as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and receipt
of a letter, provided by the individual, from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services stating the employee is clear to hire based on no administrative
Page 26 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
findings of child abuse or neglect found through a background check of child
abuse and neglect records maintained by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 161.720 to 161.800 or any other statute to the contrary,
probationary employment under this section shall terminate on receipt by the
school district of a criminal history background check documenting a record
of a sex crime or as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and no
further procedures shall be required.
(8) The provisions of KRS 161.790 shall apply to terminate employment of a certified
employee on the basis of a criminal record other than a record of a sex crime or as a
violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, or on the basis of a CA/N check
showing an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect.
(9) (a) All fingerprints requested under this section shall be on an applicant
fingerprint card provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The
fingerprint cards shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
from the Department of Kentucky State Police after a state criminal
background check is conducted. The results of the state and federal criminal
background check shall be sent to the hiring superintendent. Any fee charged
by the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be an
amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and
conducting the search.
(b) Each application form, provided by the employer to an applicant for a
certified or classified position, shall conspicuously state the following: "FOR
THIS TYPE OF EMPLOYMENT, STATE LAW REQUIRES A NATIONAL
AND STATE CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK AND A
LETTER, PROVIDED BY THE INDIVIDUAL, FROM THE CABINET
Page 27 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES STATING THE APPLICANT
HAS NO ADMINISTRATIVE FINDINGS OF CHILD ABUSE OR
NEGLECT FOUND THROUGH A BACKGROUND CHECK OF CHILD
ABUSE AND NEGLECT RECORDS MAINTAINED BY THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES."
(c) Each application form for a district position shall require the applicant to:
1. Identify the states in which he or she has maintained residency,
including the dates of residency; and
2. Provide picture identification.
(10) Notwithstanding any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary,
when an employee of the school district is charged with any offense which is
classified as a felony, the superintendent may transfer the employee to a second
position until such time as the employee is found not guilty, the charges are
dismissed, the employee is terminated, or the superintendent determines that further
personnel action is not required. The employee shall continue to be paid at the same
rate of pay he or she received prior to the transfer. If an employee is charged with
an offense outside of the Commonwealth, this provision may also be applied if the
charge would have been treated as a felony if committed within the
Commonwealth. Transfers shall be made to prevent disruption of the educational
process and district operations and in the interest of students and staff and shall not
be construed as evidence of misconduct.
(11) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each certified and classified employee of
the school district shall notify the superintendent if he or she has been found by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services to have abused or neglected a child, and if
he or she has waived the right to appeal a substantiated finding of child abuse or
neglect or if the substantiated incident was upheld upon appeal. Any failure to
report this finding shall result in the certified or classified employee being subject
Page 28 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
to dismissal or termination.
(12) The form for requesting a CA/N check shall be made available on the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services website.
Section 9. KRS 156.029 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established a Kentucky Board of Education, which shall consist of
eleven (11) voting members appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the
Senate of the General Assembly, with the president of the Council on
Postsecondary Education and the secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet
serving as ex officio nonvoting members, and an active public elementary or
secondary school teacher and a public high school student appointed by the board
as described in subsection (3) of this section serving as nonvoting members. Seven
(7) voting members shall represent each of the Supreme Court districts as
established by KRS 21A.010, and four (4) voting members shall represent the state
at large. Each of the voting members shall serve for a four (4) year term, except the
initial appointments shall be as follows: the seven (7) members representing
Supreme Court districts shall serve a term which shall expire on April 14, 1994; and
the four (4) at-large members shall serve a term which shall expire on April 14,
1992. Subsequent appointments shall be submitted to the Senate for confirmation in
accordance with KRS 11.160.
(2) Appointments of the voting members shall be made without reference to
occupation. No voting member at the time of his or her appointment or during the
term of his or her service shall be engaged as a professional educator. [Beginning
with voting members appointed on or after June 29, 2021, ]Appointments to the
group of members representing Supreme Court districts and to the group of at-large
members shall[, respectively, shall reflect equal representation of the two (2) sexes,
inasmuch as possible;] reflect no less than proportional representation of the two (2)
leading political parties of the Commonwealth based on the state's voter registration
Page 29 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
and the political affiliation of each appointee as of December 31 of the year
preceding the date of his or her appointment[; and reflect the minority racial
composition of the Commonwealth based on the total minority racial population
using the most recent census or estimate data from the United States Census
Bureau].[ If the determination of proportional minority representation does not
result in a whole number of minority members, it shall be rounded up to the next
whole number.] A particular political affiliation shall not be a prerequisite to
appointment to the board generally; however, if any person is appointed to the
board that does not represent either of the two (2) leading political parties of the
Commonwealth, the proportional representation by political affiliation requirement
shall be determined and satisfied based on the total number of members on the
board less any members not affiliated with either of the two (2) leading political
parties. Pursuant to KRS 63.080, a member shall not be removed except for cause
or, beginning with voting members appointed on or after June 29, 2021, in
accordance with KRS 63.080(3). Notwithstanding KRS 12.028, the board shall not
be subject to reorganization by the Governor.
(3) Ex officio and other nonvoting members shall not be represented by proxy at any
meeting of the board.
(4) The nonvoting teacher and student members shall be selected by the board from the
state's six (6) congressional districts on a rotating basis from different districts. The
public high school student shall be classified as a junior at the time of appointment.
The teacher and student members shall serve for a one (1) year term, except the
initial appointments shall serve a term which shall expire on April 14, 2022. The
board shall promulgate an administrative regulation establishing the process for
selecting the nonvoting teacher and student members.
(5) A vacancy in the voting membership of the board shall be filled by the Governor
for the unexpired term with the consent of the Senate. In the event that the General
Page 30 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
Assembly is not in session at the time of the appointment, the consent of the Senate
shall be obtained during the time the General Assembly next convenes.
(6) At the first regular meeting of the board in each fiscal year, a chairperson shall be
elected from its voting membership.
(7) The members shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties.
(8) The commissioner of education shall serve as the executive secretary to the board.
(9) The primary function of the board shall be to develop and adopt policies and
administrative regulations, with the advice of the Local Superintendents Advisory
Council, by which the Department of Education shall be governed in planning,
coordinating, administering, supervising, operating, and evaluating the educational
programs, services, and activities within the Department of Education which are
within the jurisdiction of the board.
Section 10. KRS 158.6452 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council is hereby created to
study, review, and make recommendations concerning Kentucky's system of setting
academic standards, assessing learning, identifying academic competencies and
deficiencies of individual students, holding schools accountable for learning, and
assisting schools to improve their performance. The council shall advise the
Kentucky Board of Education and the Legislative Research Commission on issues
related to the development and communication of the academic expectations and
core content for assessment, the development and implementation of the statewide
assessment and accountability program, recognition of high performing schools,
imposition of sanctions, and assistance for schools to improve their performance
under KRS 158.6453, 158.6455, 158.782, and 158.805.
(2) The School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council shall be
composed of seventeen (17) voting members appointed by the Governor. On
Page 31 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
making appointments to the council, the Governor shall assure broad geographical
representation and representation of elementary, middle, and secondary school
levels[; assure equal representation of the two (2) sexes, inasmuch as possible; and
assure that appointments reflect the minority racial composition of the
Commonwealth]. The members shall serve terms of two (2) years with no member
serving more than two (2) consecutive terms, except that seven (7) of the initial
appointments shall be for four (4) year terms. The members shall be appointed as
follows:
(a) Two (2) parents from recommendations submitted by organizations
representing school councils and parents;
(b) Two (2) teachers from recommendations submitted by organizations
representing teachers;
(c) Two (2) superintendents from recommendations submitted by organizations
representing superintendents;
(d) Two (2) principals from organizations representing school administrators;
(e) Two (2) local school board members from recommendations submitted by
organizations representing school boards;
(f) Two (2) school district assessment coordinators from recommendations
submitted by organizations representing district assessment coordinators;
(g) Two (2) employers in the state from recommendations submitted by
organizations representing business and industry;
(h) Two (2) university professors with expertise in assessment and measurement;
and
(i) One (1) at-large member.
(3) The School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council shall elect a chair
annually from its membership.
(4) The members shall be remunerated for actual and necessary expenses incurred
Page 32 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
while attending meetings of the council or while serving as representative of the
council.
(5) The School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council shall meet at least
four (4) times each year at times and places as it determines by resolution.
(6) The School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council shall be attached
to the Department of Education for administrative purposes. It shall be provided
appropriate staff and resources to conduct its work.
Section 11. KRS 158.6453 (Effective July 1, 2026) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Accelerated learning" means an organized way of helping students meet
individual academic goals by providing direct instruction to eliminate student
performance deficiencies or enable students to move more quickly through
course requirements and pursue higher level skill development;
(b) "Advanced coursework" means educational programs or opportunities
designed to challenge students with more rigorous content beyond the
standard curriculum, including but not limited to advanced placement,
International Baccalaureate, and honors courses;
(c) "Constructed-response items" or "performance-based items" means individual
test items that require the student to create an answer rather than select a
response and may include fill-in-the-blank, short-answer, extended-answer,
open-response, and writing-on-demand formats;
(d) "Criterion-referenced test" means a test that is aligned with defined academic
content standards and measures an individual student's level of performance
against the standards;
(e) "Formative assessment" means a process used by teachers and students during
instruction to adjust ongoing teaching and learning to improve students'
Page 33 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
achievement of intended instructional outcomes. Formative assessments may
include the use of commercial assessments, classroom observations, teacher-
designed classroom tests and assessments, and other processes and
assignments to gain information about individual student learning;
(f) "Interim assessments" means assessments that are given periodically
throughout the year to provide diagnostic information and to show individual
student performance against content standards;
(g) "Summative assessment" means an assessment given at the end of the school
year, semester, or other period of time to evaluate students' performance
against content standards within a unit of instruction or a course; and
(h) "Writing" means a purposeful act of thinking and expression that uses
language to explore ideas and communicate meaning to others. Writing is a
complex, multifaceted act of communication and is distinct from basic
handwriting or penmanship.
(2) (a) Every six (6) years, the Kentucky Department of Education shall implement a
process for reviewing Kentucky's academic standards and the alignment of
corresponding assessments for possible revision or replacement to ensure
alignment with transition readiness standards necessary for global
competitiveness, state career and technical education standards, and KRS
158.196.
(b) The revisions to the content standards shall:
1. Focus on critical knowledge, skills, and capacities needed for success in
the global economy;
2. Result in fewer but more in-depth standards to facilitate mastery
learning;
3. Communicate expectations more clearly and concisely to teachers,
parents, students, and citizens;
Page 34 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
4. Be based on evidence-based research;
5. Consider international benchmarks; and
6. Ensure that the standards are aligned from elementary to high school to
postsecondary education so that students can be successful at each
education level.
(c) 1. The department shall establish four (4) standards and assessments
review committees, with each committee composed of a minimum of six
(6) Kentucky public school teachers and a minimum of two (2)
representatives from Kentucky institutions of higher education,
including at least one (1) representative from a public institution of
higher education. Each committee member shall teach in the subject
area that his or her committee is assigned to review and have no prior or
current affiliation with a curriculum or assessment resources vendor.
2. One (1) of the four (4) committees shall be assigned to focus on the
review of language arts and writing academic standards and
assessments, one (1) on the review of mathematics academic standards
and assessments, one (1) on the review of science academic standards
and assessments, and one (1) on the review of social studies academic
standards and assessments.
(d) 1. The department shall establish twelve (12) advisory panels to advise and
assist each of the four (4) standards and assessments review committees.
2. Three (3) advisory panels shall be assigned to each standards and
assessments review committee. One (1) panel shall review the standards
and assessments for kindergarten through grade five (5), one (1) shall
review the standards and assessments for grades six (6) through eight
(8), and one (1) shall review the standards and assessments for grades
nine (9) through twelve (12).
Page 35 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
3. Each advisory panel shall be composed of at least one (1) representative
from a Kentucky institution of higher education and a minimum of six
(6) Kentucky public school teachers who teach in the grade level and
subject reviewed by the advisory panel to which they are assigned and
have no prior or current affiliation with a curriculum or assessment
resources vendor.
(e) The commissioner of education and the president of the Council on
Postsecondary Education shall also provide consultants for the standards and
assessments review committees and the advisory panels who are business and
industry professionals actively engaged in career fields that depend on the
various content areas.
(f) 1. The standards and assessments process review committee is hereby
established and shall be composed of the commissioner of education or
designee as a nonvoting member and nine (9) voting representatives of
public schools, of whom at least two (2) shall be parents of public
school students, appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate
in accordance with KRS 11.160 as follows:
a. One (1) language arts teacher;
b. One (1) math teacher;
c. One (1) science teacher;
d. One (1) social studies teacher;
e. Two (2) school principals;
f. Two (2) school superintendents; and
g. One (1) school board member.
2. On making appointments to the committee, the Governor shall ensure
broad geographical urban and rural representation and representation of
elementary, middle, and high school levels[; ensure equal representation
Page 36 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
of the two (2) sexes, inasmuch as possible; and ensure that appointments
reflect the minority racial composition of the Commonwealth].
3. The review of the committee shall be limited to the procedural aspects
of the review process undertaken prior to its consideration.
4. Notwithstanding KRS 12.028, the committee shall not be subject to
reorganization by the Governor.
(g) 1. The review process implemented under this subsection shall be an open,
transparent process that allows all Kentuckians an opportunity to
participate. The department shall ensure the public's assistance in
reviewing and suggesting changes to the standards and alignment
adjustments to corresponding state assessments by establishing a
website dedicated to collecting comments by the public and educators.
An independent third party, which has no prior or current affiliation with
a curriculum or assessment resources vendor, shall be selected by the
department to collect and transmit the comments to the department for
dissemination to the appropriate advisory panel for review and
consideration.
2. Each advisory panel shall review the standards and assessments for its
assigned subject matter and grade level and the suggestions made by the
public and educators. After completing its review, each advisory panel
shall make recommendations for changes to the standards and alignment
adjustments for assessments to the appropriate standards and
assessments review committee.
3. Each standards and assessments review committee shall review the
findings and make recommendations to revise or replace existing
standards and to adjust alignment of assessments.
4. The recommendations shall be published on the website established in
Page 37 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
this subsection for the purpose of gathering additional feedback from the
public. The commissioner shall subsequently present the
recommendations and the public feedback to the Interim Joint
Committee on Education.
5. The commissioner shall subsequently provide a report to the standards
and assessments process review committee summarizing the process
conducted under this subsection and the resulting recommendations. The
report shall include but not be limited to the timeline of the review
process, public feedback, and responses from the Interim Joint
Committee on Education.
6. After receiving the commissioner's report, the standards and assessments
process review committee shall either concur that stakeholders have had
adequate opportunity to provide input on standards and the
corresponding alignment of state assessments or find the input process
deficient. If the process is found deficient, the recommendations may be
returned to the appropriate standards and assessments review committee
for review as described in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph. If the
process is found sufficient, the recommendations shall be forwarded
without amendment to the Kentucky Board of Education.
(h) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as may be needed for the administration
of the review process, including staggering the timing and sequence of the
review process by subject area and remuneration of the review committees
and advisory panels described in paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(i) 1. The Kentucky Board of Education shall consider for approval the
revisions to academic standards for a content area and the alignment of
the corresponding state assessment once recommendations are received
Page 38 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
from the standards and assessments process review committee. Existing
state academic standards shall remain in place until the board approves
new standards.
2. Any revision to, or replacement of, the academic standards and
assessments as a result of the review process conducted under this
subsection shall be implemented in Kentucky public schools no later
than the second academic year following the review process. Existing
academic standards shall be used until new standards are implemented.
3. The Department of Education shall disseminate the academic content
standards to the schools and teacher preparation programs.
(j) The Department of Education shall provide or facilitate statewide training
sessions for existing teachers and administrators on how to:
1. Integrate the revised content standards into classroom instruction;
2. Better integrate performance assessment of students within their
instructional practices; and
3. Help all students use higher-order thinking and communication skills.
(k) The Education Professional Standards Board in cooperation with the
Kentucky Board of Education and the Council on Postsecondary Education
shall coordinate information and training sessions for faculty and staff in all of
the teacher preparation programs in the use of the revised academic content
standards. The Education Professional Standards Board shall ensure that each
teacher preparation program includes use of the academic standards in the
pre-service education programs and that all teacher interns will have
experience planning classroom instruction based on the revised standards.
(l) The Council on Postsecondary Education in cooperation with the Kentucky
Department of Education and the postsecondary education institutions in the
state shall coordinate information sessions regarding the academic content
Page 39 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
standards for faculty who teach in the various content areas.
(m) The Education Professional Standards Board shall, as a condition of program
approval, require teacher preparation programs to align curriculum with the
expectations set forth in the state's academic content standards.
(3) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education shall be responsible for creating and
implementing a balanced statewide assessment program that measures the
students', schools', and districts' achievement of the goals set forth in KRS
158.645 and 158.6451, to ensure compliance with the federal Every Student
Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95, or its successor, and to ensure
school accountability.
(b) The board shall revise the annual statewide assessment program as needed in
accordance with revised academic standards and corresponding assessment
alignment adjustments approved by the board under subsection (2) of this
section.
(c) The statewide assessments shall not include any academic standards not
approved by the board under subsection (2) of this section.
(d) The board shall seek the advice of the Office of Education Accountability; the
School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council; the Education
Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee, and the department's
technical advisory committee in the development of the assessment program.
The statewide assessment program shall not include measurement of a
student's ability to become a self-sufficient individual or to become a
responsible member of a family, work group, or community.
(4) (a) The academic components of the statewide assessment program shall be
composed of annual student summative tests, which may include a
combination of multiple competency-based assessment and performance
measures approved by the Kentucky Board of Education.
Page 40 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
(b) The annual student summative tests shall:
1. Measure individual student achievement in language, reading, English,
mathematics, science, and social studies at designated grades;
2. Provide teachers and parents a valid and reliable comprehensive analysis
of skills mastered by individual students;
3. Provide diagnostic information that identifies strengths and academic
deficiencies of individual students in the content areas;
4. Provide information to teachers that can enable them to improve
instruction for current and future students;
5. Provide longitudinal profiles for students; and
6. Ensure school and district accountability for student achievement of the
goals set forth in KRS 158.645 and 158.6451, except the statewide
assessment program shall not include measurement of a student's ability
to become a self-sufficient individual or to become a responsible
member of a family, work group, or community.
(5) The state student assessments shall include the following components:
(a) Elementary and middle grades requirements are:
1. A criterion-referenced test each in mathematics and reading in grades
three (3) through eight (8) that is valid and reliable for an individual
student and that measures the depth and breadth of Kentucky's academic
content standards;
2. A criterion-referenced test each in science and social studies that is valid
and reliable for an individual student as necessary to measure the depth
and breadth of Kentucky's academic content standards to be
administered one (1) time within the elementary and middle grades,
respectively;
3. An on-demand assessment of student writing to be administered one (1)
Page 41 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
time within the elementary grades and one (1) time within the middle
grades; and
4. An editing and mechanics test relating to writing, using multiple choice
and constructed response items, to be administered one (1) time within
the elementary and the middle grades, respectively;
(b) High school requirements are:
1. A criterion-referenced test in mathematics, reading, and science that is
valid and reliable for an individual student and that measures the depth
and breadth of Kentucky's academic content standards to be
administered one (1) time within the high school grades;
2. A criterion-referenced test in social studies that is valid and reliable for
an individual student as necessary to measure the depth and breadth of
Kentucky's academic content standards to be administered one (1) time
within the high school grades;
3. An on-demand assessment of student writing to be administered one (1)
time within the high school grades;
4. An editing and mechanics test relating to writing, using multiple choice
and constructed response items, to be administered one (1) time within
the high school grades; and
5. A college admissions examination to assess English, reading,
mathematics, and science in the spring of grade eleven (11);
(c) The Kentucky Board of Education shall add any other component necessary
to comply with the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95,
or its successor, as determined by the United States Department of Education;
(d) The criterion-referenced components required in this subsection shall be
composed of constructed response items and multiple choice items; and
(e) The results of the assessment program developed under this subsection shall
Page 42 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
be used by schools and districts to determine appropriate instructional
modifications for all students in order for students to make continuous
progress, including that needed by advanced learners.
(6) Each school district shall administer the statewide student assessment during the
last fourteen (14) days of school in the district's instructional calendar. The
Kentucky Board of Education may change the testing window to allow for
innovative assessment systems or other online test administration and shall
promulgate administrative regulations that minimize the number of days of testing
and outline the procedures to be used during the testing process to ensure test
security, including procedures for testing makeup days, and to comply with federal
assessment requirements.
(7) A student enrolled in a district-operated or district-contracted alternative program
shall participate in the appropriate assessments required by this section.
(8) A local school district may select and use commercial interim or formative
assessments or develop and use its own formative assessments to provide data on
how well its students are growing toward mastery of Kentucky academic standards,
so long as the district's local school board develops a policy minimizing the
reduction in instructional time related to the administration of the interim
assessments. Nothing in this section precludes teachers from using ongoing teacher-
developed formative processes.
(9) Each school that enrolls primary students shall use diagnostic assessments and
prompts that measure readiness in reading and mathematics for its primary students
as determined by the school to be developmentally appropriate. The schools may
use commercial products, use products and procedures developed by the district, or
develop their own diagnostic procedures. The results shall be used to inform the
teachers and parents or guardians of each student's skill level.
(10) The state board shall ensure that a technically sound longitudinal comparison of the
Page 43 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
assessment results for the same students shall be made available.
(11) The following provisions shall apply to the college admissions examination
described in subsection (5)(b)5. of this section:
(a) The cost of the college admissions examination administered to students in
high school shall be paid for by the Kentucky Department of Education. The
costs of additional college admissions examinations shall be the responsibility
of the student;
(b) If funds are available, the Kentucky Department of Education shall provide a
college admissions examination preparation program to all public high school
juniors. The department may contract for necessary services; and
(c) Accommodations provided to a student with a disability taking the college
admissions assessment under this subsection shall consist of:
1. Accommodations provided in a manner allowed by the college
admissions assessment provider when results in test scores are
reportable to a postsecondary institution for admissions and placement
purposes, except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph; or
2. Accommodations provided in a manner allowed by a student's
individualized education program as defined in KRS 158.281 for a
student whose disability precludes valid assessment of his or her
academic abilities using the accommodations provided under
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph when the student's scores are not
reportable to a postsecondary institution for admissions and placement
purposes.
(12) Kentucky teachers shall have a significant role in providing feedback about the
design of the assessments, except for the college admissions exam described in
subsection (5)(b)5. of this section. The assessments shall be designed to:
(a) Measure grade appropriate core academic content, basic skills, and higher-
Page 44 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
order thinking skills and their application;
(b) Provide valid and reliable scores for schools. If scores are reported for
students individually, they shall be valid and reliable;
(c) Minimize the time spent by teachers and students on assessment; and
(d) Assess Kentucky academic standards only.
(13) The results from assessment under subsections (3) and (5) of this section shall be
reported to the school districts and schools no later than seventy-five (75) days
following the last day the assessment can be administered. Assessment reports
provided to the school districts and schools shall include an electronic copy of an
operational subset of test items from each assessment administered to their students
and the results for each of those test items by student and by school.
(14) The Department of Education shall gather information to establish the validity of
the assessment and accountability program. It shall develop a biennial plan for
validation studies that shall include but not be limited to the consistency of student
results across multiple measures, the congruence of school scores with documented
improvements in instructional practice and the school learning environment, and the
potential for all scores to yield fair, consistent, and accurate student performance
level and school accountability decisions. Validation activities shall take place in a
timely manner and shall include a review of the accuracy of scores assigned to
students and schools, as well as of the testing materials. The plan shall be submitted
to the Commission by July 1 of the first year of each biennium. A summary of the
findings shall be submitted to the Legislative Research Commission by September
1 of the second year of the biennium.
(15) The Department of Education and the state board shall offer optional assistance to
local school districts and schools in developing and using continuous assessment
strategies needed to ensure student progress. The continuous assessment shall
provide diagnostic information to improve instruction to meet the needs of
Page 45 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
individual students.
(16) The Administration Code for Kentucky's Assessment Program shall include
prohibitions of inappropriate test preparation activities by school district employees
charged with test administration and oversight, including but not limited to the issue
of teachers being required to do test practice in lieu of regular classroom instruction
and test practice outside the normal work day. The code shall include disciplinary
sanctions that may be taken toward a school or individuals.
(17) The Kentucky Board of Education, after the Department of Education has received
advice from the Office of Education Accountability; the School Curriculum,
Assessment, and Accountability Council; and the department's technical advisory
committee, shall promulgate an administrative regulation under KRS Chapter 13A
to establish the components of a reporting structure for assessments administered
under this section. The reporting structure shall include the following components:
(a) A school report card that clearly communicates with parents and the public
about school performance. The school report card shall be sent to the parents
of the students of the districts, and information on electronic access to a
summary of the results for the district shall be published in the newspaper
with the largest circulation in the county. It shall include but not be limited to
the following components reported by race, gender, and disability when
appropriate:
1. Student academic achievement, including the results from each of the
assessments administered under this section;
2. For Advanced Placement, Cambridge Advanced International, and
International Baccalaureate, the courses offered, the number of students
enrolled, completing, and taking the examination for each course, and
the percentage of examinees receiving a score of three (3) or better on
AP examinations, a score of "e" or better on Cambridge Advanced
Page 46 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
International examinations, or a score of four (4) or better on IB
examinations. The data shall be disaggregated by gender, race, students
with disabilities, and economic status;
3. Nonacademic achievement, including the school's attendance, retention,
graduation rates, and student transition to postsecondary;
4. School learning environment, including measures of parental
involvement; and
5. Any other school performance data required by the Every Student
Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95, or its successor;
(b) An individual student report to parents for each student in grades three (3)
through eight (8) summarizing the student's skills in reading, science, social
studies, and mathematics. The school's staff shall develop a plan for
accelerated learning for any student with identified deficiencies or strengths;
and
(c) A student's score on the college admissions assessment administered under
subsection (5)(b)5. of this section.
(18) (a) Every six (6) years, the Kentucky Department of Education shall implement a
comprehensive process for reviewing and revising the academic standards in
visual and performing arts and practical living skills and career studies for all
levels and in foreign language for middle and high schools. The department
shall develop review committees for the standards for each of the content
areas that include representation from certified specialist public school
teachers and postsecondary teachers in those subject areas.
(b) The academic standards in practical living skills for elementary, middle, and
high school levels shall include a focus on drug abuse prevention, with an
emphasis on the prescription drug epidemic and the connection between
prescription opioid abuse and addiction to other drugs, such as heroin and
Page 47 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
synthetic drugs.
(c) The department shall provide to all schools guidelines for programs that
incorporate the adopted academic standards in visual and performing arts and
practical living and career studies. The department shall provide to middle and
high schools guidelines for including a foreign language program. The
guidelines shall address program length and time, courses offered, staffing,
resources, and facilities.
(d) The Kentucky Department of Education, in consultation with certified public
school teachers of visual and performing arts, may develop program standards
for the visual and performing arts.
(19) The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide to all school districts
guidelines for including an effective writing program within the curriculum.
(20) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education, in consultation with the review
committees described in subsection (18) of this section, shall develop a school
profile report to be used by all schools to document how they will address the
adopted academic standards in their implementation of the programs as
described in subsection (18) of this section, which may include student
opportunities and experiences in extracurricular activities. The department
shall include the essential workplace ethics program on the school profile
report.
(b) By October 1 of each year, each school principal shall complete the school
profile report, which shall be signed by the members of the school council, or
the principal if no school council exists, and the superintendent. The report
shall be electronically transmitted to the Kentucky Department of Education,
and the original shall be maintained on file at the local board office and made
available to the public upon request. The department shall include a link to
each school's profile report on its website.
Page 48 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
(c) If a school staff member, student, or a student's parent has concerns regarding
deficiencies in a school's implementation of the programs described in
subsection (18) of this section, he or she may submit a written inquiry to the
school council.
(21) (a) No later than December 1, 2025, each local board of education shall adopt a
district plan establishing clear policies on the promotion of advanced
coursework or accelerated learning in language arts, mathematics, social
studies, and science by grade level for students in grades four (4) to twelve
(12).
(b) The district plan required by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:
1. Be published on a publicly accessible location on the district website;
2. Describe the strategies and approach to advanced coursework or
accelerated learning options by grade level for language arts,
mathematics, social studies, and science; and
3. Require that the service delivery options for students identified as gifted
and talented in language arts, mathematics, social studies, and science
include the following for each grade level and subject area:
a. i. Accelerated learning; or
ii. Advanced coursework; and
b. At least one (1) of the following service delivery options:
i. Collaborative teaching and consultation services;
ii. Special counseling services;
iii. Differentiated study experiences for individuals and cluster
groups in the regular classroom;
iv. Distance learning;
v. Enrichment services that are not extracurricular during the
school day;
Page 49 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
vi. Independent study;
vii. Mentorships;
viii. Resource services delivered in a pull-out classroom or other
appropriate instructional setting;
ix. Seminars;
x. Travel study options; or
xi. Special schools or self-contained classrooms for students in
grades four (4) through twelve (12) only.
(c) The district plan required by paragraph (a) of this subsection may:
1. Automatically enroll a student who scores distinguished in any subject
area on the most recent statewide assessment for which scores are
available in available advanced coursework for that subject area and any
corresponding subject area designated by the local board of education;
2. Include eligibility criteria for qualification for available advanced
coursework for all other students;
3. Require written consent from a parent or guardian of a student to
withdraw or exclude a student that is eligible for advanced coursework
according to the district plan from that advanced coursework. If a
student requests to withdraw from advanced coursework to pursue
another educational opportunity, a principal may withdraw the student
without written consent from a parent or guardian only after a good-faith
attempt to contact the parent or guardian is unsuccessful; and
4. Permit a principal to withdraw a student from advanced coursework
without written consent from his or her parent or guardian if the
student's participation in advanced coursework would have an adverse
educational impact on a student, including interference with his or her
career pathway, access to career and technical education coursework, or
Page 50 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
another educational opportunity.
(22) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education may promulgate administrative regulations
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to administer the provisions of
subsection (21) of this section.
(b) By December 1, 2025, the Kentucky Department of Education, in
collaboration with local school districts, shall establish school district
recommendations for the consistent use of preliminary assessment data and
other criteria to identify students prepared for advanced coursework.
Section 12. KRS 160.345 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of this section:
(a) ["Minority" means American Indian; Alaskan native; African-American;
Hispanic, including persons of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, and Central or
South American origin; Pacific islander; or other ethnic group
underrepresented in the school;
(b) ]"School" means an elementary or secondary educational institution that is
under the administrative control of a principal and is not a program or part of
another school. The term "school" does not include district-operated schools
that are:
1. Exclusively vocational-technical, special education, or preschool
programs;
2. Instructional programs operated in institutions or schools outside of the
district; or
3. Alternative schools designed to provide services to at-risk populations
with unique needs;
(b)[(c)] "Teacher" means any person for whom certification is required as a
basis of employment in the public schools of the state, with the exception of
principals and assistant principals; and
Page 51 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
(c)[(d)] "Parent" means:
1. A parent, stepparent, or foster parent of a student; or
2. A person who has legal custody of a student pursuant to a court order
and with whom the student resides.
(2) Each local board of education shall adopt a policy for implementing school-based
decision making in the district which shall include but not be limited to a
description of how the district's policies, including those developed pursuant to
KRS 160.340, have been amended to allow the professional staff members of a
school to be involved in the decision-making process as they work to meet
educational goals established in KRS 158.645 and 158.6451. The policy may
include a requirement that each school council make an annual report at a public
meeting of the board describing the school's progress in meeting the educational
goals set forth in KRS 158.6451 and district goals established by the board. The
policy shall also address and comply with the following:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b)2. of this subsection, each participating
school shall form a school council composed of two (2) parents, three (3)
teachers, and the principal or administrator. The membership of the council
may be increased, but it may only be increased proportionately. A parent
representative on the council shall not be an employee or a relative of an
employee of the school in which that parent serves, nor shall the parent
representative be an employee or a relative of an employee in the district
administrative offices. A parent representative shall not be a local board
member or a board member's spouse. None of the members shall have a
conflict of interest pursuant to KRS Chapter 45A, except the salary paid to
district employees;
(b) [1. ]The teacher representatives shall be elected for one (1) year
terms by a majority of the teachers. A teacher elected to a school
Page 52 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
council shall not be involuntarily transferred during the teacher
representative's term of office. The parent representatives shall be
elected for one (1) year terms. The parent members shall be
elected by the parents of students preregistered to attend the school
during the term of office in an election conducted by the parent
and teacher organization of the school or, if none exists, the largest
organization of parents formed for this purpose. Council elections
may allow voting to occur over multiple days and via electronic
means. A school council, once elected, may adopt a policy setting
different terms of office for parent and teacher members
subsequently elected. The principal shall be the chair of the school
council.[
2. School councils in schools having eight percent (8%) or more
minority students enrolled, as determined by the enrollment on the
preceding October 1, shall have at least one (1) minority member.
If the council formed under paragraph (a) of this subsection does
not have a minority member, the principal, in a timely manner,
shall be responsible for carrying out the following:
a. Organizing a special election to elect an additional member. The
principal shall call for nominations and shall notify the parents of
the students of the date, time, and location of the election to elect a
minority parent to the council by ballot; and
b. Allowing the teachers in the building to select one (1) minority
teacher to serve as a teacher member on the council. If there are no
minority teachers who are members of the faculty, an additional
teacher member shall be elected by a majority of all teachers.
Term limitations shall not apply for a minority teacher member
Page 53 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
who is the only minority on faculty;]
(c) 1. The school council shall have the responsibility to set school policy that
shall be consistent with district board policy and which shall provide an
environment to enhance the students' achievement and help the school
meet the goals established by KRS 158.645 and 158.6451 and goals for
the district established by the board. The principal shall be the primary
administrator and the instructional leader of the school, and with the
assistance of the total school staff shall administer the policies
established by the school council and the local board.
2. If a school council establishes committees, it shall adopt a policy to
facilitate the participation of interested persons, including, but not
limited to, classified employees and parents. The policy shall include the
number of committees, their jurisdiction, composition, and the process
for membership selection;
(d) The school council and each of its committees shall determine the frequency
of and agenda for their meetings. Matters relating to formation of school
councils that are not provided for by this section shall be addressed by local
board policy;
(e) The meetings of the school council shall be open to the public and all
interested persons may attend. However, the exceptions to open meetings
provided in KRS 61.810 shall apply;
(f) After receiving notification of the funds available for the school from the local
board, the school council shall determine, within the parameters of the total
available funds, the number of persons to be employed in each job
classification at the school. The council may make personnel decisions on
vacancies occurring after the school council is formed but shall not have the
authority to recommend transfers or dismissals;
Page 54 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
(g) The local superintendent shall determine which curriculum, textbooks,
instructional materials, and student support services shall be provided in the
school after consulting with the local board of education, the school principal,
and the school council and after a reasonable review and response period for
stakeholders in accordance with local board of education policy. Subject to
available resources, the local board shall allocate an appropriation to each
school that is adequate to meet the school's needs related to instructional
materials and school-based student support services, as determined by the
school principal after consultation with the school council. The school council
shall consult with the school media librarian on the maintenance of the school
library media center, including the purchase of instructional materials,
information technology, and equipment;
(h) Personnel decisions at the school level shall be as follows:
1. From a list of qualified applicants submitted by the local superintendent,
the principal at the participating school shall select personnel to fill
vacancies, after consultation with the school council, consistent with
paragraph (i)11. of this subsection. The superintendent shall provide
additional applicants to the principal upon request when qualified
applicants are available. The superintendent may forward to the school
principal the names of qualified applicants who have pending
certification from the Education Professional Standards Board based on
recent completion of preparation requirements, out-of-state preparation,
or alternative routes to certification pursuant to KRS 161.028 and
161.048. Requests for transfer shall conform to any employer-employee
bargained contract which is in effect;
2. If the vacancy to be filled is the position of principal:
a. The superintendent shall fill the vacancy after consultation with
Page 55 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
the school council consistent with paragraph (i)11. of this
subsection;
b. Prior to consultation with the school council, each member shall
sign a nondisclosure agreement forbidding the disclosure of
information shared and discussions held during consultation;
c. A person who believes a violation of the nondisclosure agreement
referred to in subdivision b. of this subparagraph has occurred may
file a written complaint with the Kentucky Board of Education;
and
d. A school council member found to have violated the nondisclosure
agreement referred to in subdivision b. of this subparagraph may
be subject to removal from the school council by the Kentucky
Board of Education under subsection (9)(e) of this section;
3. Notwithstanding subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, if the vacancy to be
filled is the position of principal in a county school district in a county
with a consolidated local government adopted under KRS Chapter 67C,
then:
a. The outgoing principal shall not serve on the council during the
principal selection process. The superintendent or the
superintendent's designee shall serve as the chair of the council for
the purpose of the hiring process and shall have voting rights
during the selection process;
b. The council shall have access to the applications of all persons
certified for the position. The principal shall be elected on a
majority vote of the membership of the council. The school
council shall receive training in recruitment and interviewing
techniques prior to carrying out the process of selecting a
Page 56 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
principal. The council shall select the trainer to deliver the
training; and
c. Notwithstanding the requirement that a principal be elected by a
majority vote of the council, the selection of a principal shall be
subject to approval by the superintendent. If the superintendent
does not approve the principal selected by the council, then the
superintendent may select the principal;
4. No principal who has been previously removed from a position in the
district for cause may be considered for appointment as principal in that
district;
5. Personnel decisions made at the school level under the authority of
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be binding on the superintendent
who completes the hiring process;
6. Applicants subsequently employed shall provide evidence that they are
certified prior to assuming the duties of a position in accordance with
KRS 161.020; and
7. Notwithstanding other provisions of this paragraph, if the applicant is
the spouse of the superintendent and the applicant meets the service
requirements of KRS 160.380(3)(a), the applicant shall only be
employed upon the recommendation of the principal and the approval of
a majority vote of the school council;
(i) The school council shall adopt a policy that shall be consistent with local
board policy and shall be implemented by the principal in the following
additional areas:
1. Curriculum responsibilities under KRS 158.6453(19);
2. Assignment of all instructional and noninstructional staff time;
3. Assignment of students to classes and programs within the school;
Page 57 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
4. Determination of the schedule of the school day and week, subject to the
beginning and ending times of the school day and school calendar year
as established by the local board;
5. Determination of use of school space during the school day related to
improving classroom teaching and learning;
6. Planning and resolution of issues regarding instructional practices;
7. Selection and implementation of discipline and classroom management
techniques as a part of a comprehensive school safety plan, including
responsibilities of the student, parent, teacher, counselor, and principal;
8. Selection of extracurricular programs and determination of policies
relating to student participation based on academic qualifications and
attendance requirements, program evaluation, and supervision;
9. Adoption of an emergency plan as required in KRS 158.162;
10. Procedures, consistent with local school board policy, for determining
alignment with state standards, technology utilization, and program
appraisal; and
11. Procedures to assist the council with consultation in the selection of the
principal by the superintendent, and the selection of personnel by the
principal, including but not limited to meetings, timelines, interviews,
review of written applications, and review of references. Procedures
shall address situations in which members of the council are not
available for consultation; and
(j) Each school council shall annually review data as shown on state and local
student assessments required under KRS 158.6453. The data shall include but
not be limited to information on performance levels of all students tested, and
information on the performance of students disaggregated by race, gender,
disability, and participation in the federal free and reduced price lunch
Page 58 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
program. After completing the review of data, each school council, with the
involvement of parents, faculty, and staff, shall develop and adopt a plan to
ensure that each student makes progress toward meeting the goals set forth in
KRS 158.645 and 158.6451(1)(b) by April 1 of each year and submit the plan
to the superintendent and local board of education for review as described in
KRS 160.340. The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide each
school council the data needed to complete the review required by this
paragraph no later than October 1 of each year. If a school does not have a
council, the review shall be completed by the principal with the involvement
of parents, faculty, and staff.
(3) The policies adopted by the local board to implement school-based decision making
shall also address the following:
(a) School budget and administration, including: discretionary funds; activity and
other school funds; funds for maintenance, supplies, and equipment; and
procedures for authorizing reimbursement for training and other expenses;
(b) Assessment of individual student progress, including testing and reporting of
student progress to students, parents, the school district, the community, and
the state;
(c) School improvement plans, including the form and function of strategic
planning and its relationship to district planning, as well as the school safety
plan and requests for funding from the Center for School Safety under KRS
158.446;
(d) Professional development plans developed pursuant to KRS 156.095;
(e) Parent, citizen, and community participation including the relationship of the
council with other groups;
(f) Cooperation and collaboration within the district, with other districts, and with
other public and private agencies;
Page 59 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
(g) Requirements for waiver of district policies;
(h) Requirements for record keeping by the school council; and
(i) A process for appealing a decision made by a school council.
(4) In addition to the authority granted to the school council in this section, the local
board may grant to the school council any other authority permitted by law. The
board shall make available liability insurance coverage for the protection of all
members of the school council from liability arising in the course of pursuing their
duties as members of the council.
(5) All schools shall implement school-based decision making in accordance with this
section and with the policy adopted by the local board pursuant to this section.
Upon favorable vote of a majority of the faculty at the school and a majority of at
least twenty-five (25) voting parents of students enrolled in the school, a school
meeting its goal as determined by the Department of Education pursuant to KRS
158.6455 may apply to the Kentucky Board of Education for exemption from the
requirement to implement school-based decision making, and the state board shall
grant the exemption. The voting by the parents on the matter of exemption from
implementing school-based decision making shall be in an election conducted by
the parent and teacher organization of the school or, if none exists, the largest
organization of parents formed for this purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of
this section, a local school district shall not be required to implement school-based
decision making if the local school district contains only one (1) school.
(6) The Department of Education shall provide professional development activities to
assist schools in implementing school-based decision making. School council
members elected for the first time shall complete a minimum of six (6) clock hours
of training in the process of school-based decision making, no later than thirty (30)
days after the beginning of the service year for which they are elected to serve.
School council members who have served on a school council at least one (1) year
Page 60 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
shall complete a minimum of three (3) clock hours of training in the process of
school-based decision making no later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the
beginning of the service year for which they are elected to serve. Experienced
members may participate in the training for new members to fulfill their training
requirement. School council training required under this subsection shall be
conducted by trainers endorsed by the Department of Education. By November 1 of
each year, the principal through the local superintendent shall forward to the
Department of Education the names and addresses of each council member and
verify that the required training has been completed. School council members
elected to fill a vacancy shall complete the applicable training within thirty (30)
days of their election.
(7) A school that chooses to have school-based decision making but would like to be
exempt from the administrative structure set forth by this section may develop a
model for implementing school-based decision making, including but not limited to
a description of the membership, organization, duties, and responsibilities of a
school council. The school shall submit the model through the local board of
education to the commissioner of education and the Kentucky Board of Education,
which shall have final authority for approval. The application for approval of the
model shall show evidence that it has been developed by representatives of the
parents, students, certified personnel, and the administrators of the school and that
two-thirds (2/3) of the faculty have agreed to the model.
(8) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon recommendation of the commissioner of
education, shall adopt by administrative regulation a formula by which school
district funds shall be allocated to each school council. Included in the school
council formula shall be an allocation for professional development that is at least
sixty-five percent (65%) of the district's per pupil state allocation for professional
development for each student in average daily attendance in the school. The school
Page 61 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
council shall plan professional development in compliance with requirements
specified in KRS 156.095, except as provided in KRS 158.649. School councils of
small schools shall be encouraged to work with other school councils to maximize
professional development opportunities.
(9) (a) No board member, superintendent of schools, district employee, or member of
a school council shall intentionally engage in a pattern of practice which is
detrimental to the successful implementation of or circumvents the intent of
school-based decision making to allow the professional staff members of a
school and parents to be involved in the decision making process in working
toward meeting the educational goals established in KRS 158.645 and
158.6451 or to make decisions in areas of policy assigned to a school council
pursuant to paragraph (i) of subsection (2) of this section.
(b) An affected party who believes a violation of this subsection has occurred
may file a written complaint with the Office of Education Accountability. The
office shall investigate the complaint and resolve the conflict, if possible, or
forward the matter to the Kentucky Board of Education.
(c) The Kentucky Board of Education shall conduct a hearing in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13B for complaints referred by the Office of Education
Accountability.
(d) If the state board determines a violation has occurred, the party shall be
subject to reprimand. A second violation of this subsection may be grounds
for removing a superintendent or a member of a school council from office or
grounds for dismissal of an employee for misconduct in office or willful
neglect of duty.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (d) of this subsection and KRS 7.410(2)(c), if the
state board determines a violation of the nondisclosure agreement required by
subsection (2)(h)2.b. of this section by a school council member has occurred,
Page 62 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
the state board shall remove the member from the school council, and the
member shall be permanently prohibited from serving on any school council
in the district.
(10) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (9) of this section, a school's right to establish or
maintain a school-based decision making council and the powers, duties, and
authority granted to a school council may be rescinded or the school council's role
may be advisory if the commissioner of education or the Kentucky Board of
Education takes action under KRS 160.346.
(11) Each school council of a school containing grades K-5 or any combination thereof,
or if there is no school council, the principal, shall develop and implement a
wellness policy that includes moderate to vigorous physical activity each day and
encourages healthy choices among students. The policy may permit physical
activity to be considered part of the instructional day, not to exceed thirty (30)
minutes per day, or one hundred and fifty (150) minutes per week. Each school
council, or if there is no school council, the principal, shall adopt an assessment tool
to determine each child's level of physical activity on an annual basis. The council
or principal may utilize an existing assessment program. The Kentucky Department
of Education shall make available a list of available resources to carry out the
provisions of this subsection. The department shall report to the Legislative
Research Commission no later than November 1 of each year on how the schools
are providing physical activity under this subsection and on the types of physical
activity being provided. The policy developed by the school council or principal
shall comply with provisions required by federal law, state law, or local board
policy.
Section 13. KRS 160.352 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [For purposes of this section the term "minority" means American Indian; Alaskan
native; African-American; Hispanic, including persons of Mexican, Puerto Rican,
Page 63 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
Cuban, and Central or South American origin; Pacific islander; or other ethnic
group underrepresented in a local school district.
(2) ]Each board of education shall appoint a superintendent of schools after receiving
the recommendations of a screening committee. A screening committee shall be
established within thirty (30) days of a determination by a board of education that a
vacancy has occurred or will occur in the office of superintendent, except that when
the board determines a vacancy will not occur before six (6) months from the date
of determination, the board shall establish a screening committee at least ninety
(90) days before the first date on which the position may be filled.
(2)[(3)] A screening committee shall be composed of:
(a) Two (2) teachers, elected by the teachers in the district;
(b) One (1) board of education member, appointed by the board chairman;
(c) One (1) principal, elected by the principals in the district;
(d) One (1) parent, elected by the presidents of the parent-teacher organizations of
the schools in the district; and
(e) One (1) classified employee, elected by the classified employees in the
district[; and
(f) If a minority member is not elected or appointed to a screening committee in
districts with a minority population of eight percent (8%) or more, as
determined by the enrollment on the preceding October 1, the committee
membership shall be increased to include one (1) minority parent. This
minority parent member shall be elected by the parents in an election
conducted by the local school board. Parents in the district shall be given
adequate notice of the date, time, place, and purpose of the election].
(3)[(4)] Prior to appointing a superintendent of schools, the board of education shall
consider the recommendations of the screening committee, but the board shall not
be required to appoint a superintendent from the committee's recommendations.
Page 64 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
Section 14. KRS 161.167 is amended to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2001, the Kentucky Department of Education, with help from
representatives of the Education Professional Standards Board, the Council on
Postsecondary Education, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority, the
Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities, public and private
not-for-profit postsecondary institutions, and local educational agencies, shall
develop a plan, including timelines for implementation, for a multidimensional
recruitment and information program, to encourage persons to enter the teaching
profession and to seek employment in Kentucky.
(2) [The program shall not supplant or diminish current efforts required in KRS
161.165.
(3) ]The components of the program shall include:
(a) Early recruitment programs to inform middle and high school students about
the potential of teaching as a career;
(b) Programs to encourage paraprofessionals in schools, as well as other
nontraditional students, to pursue additional education to become teachers;
(c) Programs to enlist highly skilled career employees in specific content areas to
pursue teaching as a second career;
(d) Options for recruiting persons with liberal arts and sciences majors and
current students with nondeclared majors into nontraditional and accelerated
teacher preparation programs;
(e) Marketing strategies for informing the public of the importance of high
quality teaching to student achievement, the value of teachers to society as a
whole, the benefits and rewards of teaching, and the options for entering
teacher preparation, including scholarship information; and
(f) Expanding the Kentucky Department of Education's electronic bulletin board
for certified vacancies in local school districts to include an option for
Page 65 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
potential teachers to voluntarily post their availability for education positions
within the state.
(3)[(4)] No later than March 15, 2001, the Department of Education shall present a
status report of the recruitment and information program to the Interim Joint
Committee on Education; and no later than October 15, 2001, the Department of
Education shall present to the Interim Joint Committee on Education and the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue a summary report with
recommendations.
Section 15. The following KRS sections are repealed:
156.500 Appointments to reflect reasonable minority representation.
161.165 Recruitment of minority teachers.
Section 16. (1) Each school district shall:
(a) No later than June 30, 2026, review its organizational structure and existing
contracts related to diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives to ensure compliance with
the requirements of Section 2 of this Act, eliminate all diversity, equity, and inclusion
initiatives and diversity, equity, and inclusion offices, and terminate or transfer all
diversity, equity, and inclusion officers, as those terms are defined in Section 1 of this
Act. A school district may only transfer a diversity, equity, and inclusion officer to
another position within the district if:
1. The new position is open and existed prior to January 1, 2026;
2. The transferred individual is qualified for the new position; and
3. The duties of the new position comply with Section 2 of this Act;
(b) No later than August 30, 2026, report the following information for each
former diversity, equity, and inclusion officer employed by the school district at any
point between January 1, 2026, and the effective date of this Act who is transferred,
reassigned, or rehired by the school district prior to August 30, 2026, to the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the appropriate interim joint committee:
Page 66 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
1. Full name;
2. Present job title, duty station, and salary or wages;
3. Former job title, duty station, and salary or wages; and
4. Any amount of additional compensation paid to the individual upon
reassignment, transfer, termination, or rehire;
(c) Review all trainings, orientations, or similar programming related to diversity,
equity, and inclusion to ensure compliance with Section 2 of this Act. A school district
and the Kentucky Department of Education shall promptly terminate the use of a
diversity, equity, and inclusion training that violates Section 2 of this Act. If the training,
orientation, or similar programing is offered through a third party, such as a contractor,
the school district shall promptly:
1. Terminate any contract with the third party, consistent with applicable law
and administrative regulations; and
2. Evaluate whether to permanently bar the third party from contracts, consistent
with applicable law and administrative regulations; and
(d) No later than August 30, 2026, submit a report to the Legislative Research
Commission and the Attorney General on its compliance with this section and Sections 2
and 4 of this Act that certifies the status of its compliance, the steps taken to achieve
compliance, and the guardrails put in place to ensure future compliance.
(2) Each school district shall submit the reports required by subsections (1)(b)
and (1)(d) of this section to the Kentucky Department of Education. The department shall
publish each report submitted by a school district to a central location on the department's
website. If a school district fails to submit a report as required by this section, that fact
shall be clearly notated on that same website. The department shall investigate any failure
to report, and submit a report of any noncompliance to the Legislative Research
Commission for referral to the appropriate interim joint committee no later than October
1, 2026.
Page 67 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
(3) The Attorney General may bring a civil action for a writ of mandamus to
compel a school district to comply with this section.
Section 17. (1) The Kentucky Department of Education shall:
(a) No later than June 30, 2026, eliminate any diversity, equity, and inclusion
offices and terminate or transfer all diversity, equity, and inclusion officers. The
department may only transfer an employee to another position within the department if:
1. The new position is open and existed prior to January 1, 2026;
2. The transferred individual is qualified for the new position; and
3. The duties of the new position comply with Section 2 of this Act;
(b) No later than August 30, 2026, report the following information for each
former employee employed by the department at any point between January 1, 2026, and
the effective date of this Act who is terminated or transferred under paragraph (a) of this
subsection and is transferred, reassigned, or rehired by the department prior to August 30,
2026, to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the appropriate interim joint
committee:
1. Full name;
2. Present job title, duty station, and salary or wages;
3. Former job title, duty station, and salary or wages; and
4. Any amount of additional compensation paid to the individual upon
reassignment, transfer, termination, or rehire;
(c) Review all trainings, orientations, or similar programming related to diversity,
equity, and inclusion to ensure compliance with Section 2 of this Act and promptly
terminate the use or promotion of any diversity, equity, and inclusion training that
violates Section 2 of this Act. If the training, orientation, or similar programing is offered
through a third party, such as a contractor, the department shall promptly:
1. Terminate any contract with the third party, consistent with applicable law
and administrative regulations; and
Page 68 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
2. Evaluate whether to permanently bar the third party from contracts, consistent
with applicable law and administrative regulations;
(d) No later than August 1, 2026, submit a report to the Legislative Research
Commission and the Attorney General on its compliance with this section and Sections 2
and 3 of this Act that certifies the status of its compliance, the steps taken to achieve
compliance, and the guardrails put in place to ensure future compliance; and
(e) Publish the reports required by paragraphs (b) and (d) of this subsection to a
central location on the department's website.
(2) The Attorney General may bring a civil action for a writ of mandamus to
compel the Kentucky Department of Education to comply with this section.
Section 18. (1) Each cooperative board, as defined in Section 1 of this Act,
shall:
(a) No later than June 30, 2026, eliminate any diversity, equity, and inclusion
office, as defined in Section 1 of this Act, and terminate or transfer all employees of those
offices and all diversity, equity, and inclusion officers, as defined in Section 1 of this Act.
A cooperative board may only transfer an employee to another position within the
cooperative board if:
1. The new position is open and existed prior to January 1, 2026;
2. The transferred individual is qualified for the new position; and
3. The duties of the new position comply with Section 2 of this Act;
(b) No later than August 30, 2026, report the following information for each
former employee employed by the cooperative board at any point between January 1,
2026, and the effective date of this Act who is terminated or transferred under paragraph
(a) of this subsection and is transferred, reassigned, or rehired by the cooperative board
prior to August 30, 2026, to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the
appropriate interim joint committee:
1. Full name;
Page 69 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
2. Present job title, duty station, and salary or wages;
3. Former job title, duty station, and salary or wages; and
4. Any amount of additional compensation paid to the individual upon
reassignment, transfer, termination, or rehire;
(c) Review all trainings, orientations, or similar programming related to diversity,
equity, and inclusion to ensure compliance with Section 2 of this Act and promptly
terminate the use or promotion of any diversity, equity, and inclusion training that
violates Section 2 of this Act. If the training, orientation, or similar programing is offered
through a third party, such as a contractor, the department shall promptly:
1. Terminate any contract with the third party, consistent with applicable law
and administrative regulations; and
2. Evaluate whether to permanently bar the third party from contracts, consistent
with applicable law and administrative regulations;
(d) No later than August 1, 2026, submit a report to the Legislative Research
Commission and the Attorney General on its compliance with this section and Section 2
of this Act that certifies the status of its compliance, the steps taken to achieve
compliance, and the guardrails put in place to ensure future compliance; and
(e) Publish the reports required by paragraphs (b) and (d) of this subsection to a
central location on the department's website.
(2) The Attorney General may bring a civil action for a writ of mandamus to
compel the cooperative board to comply with this section.
Section 19. This Act may be cited as the Kentucky Education Equality
Protection Act or the KEEP Act.
Section 20. Section 3 of this Act takes effect February 1, 2027.
Section 21. Section 11 of this Act takes effect July 1, 2026.
Section 22. Whereas the General Assembly is committed to honoring the
constitutional promise of equal protection under the law, regardless of color, creed, race,
Page 70 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1149
ethnicity, sex, age, marital status, familial status, disability, religion, and national origin,
an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16,
17, 18, and 19 of this Act take effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or
upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 71 of 71
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:50 PM Jacketed